Utah statutes.
75-3-108.   Statutes of limitation on decedent's cause of action.

No statute of limitation running on a cause of action belonging to a decedent which had not been barred as of the date of his death shall apply to bar a cause of action surviving the decedent's death sooner than 12 months after death. A cause of action which, but for this section, would have been barred less than 12 months after death, is barred after 12 months unless tolled.

